Maine, session 132, LD1239.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 34-B MRSA §3004, sub-§3, ¶C, as amended by PL 1995, c. 560, Pt. K,
§33, is further amended to read:
C. Prepare a report that describes the system of community support services in each
of the mental health service regions and statewide.
(1) The report must include both existing service resources and deficiencies in the
system of services., including:
(a) An analysis of existing service resources and system deficiencies. The
analysis must specifically identify any deficiency that contributed to a denial
of a referral as reported to the department under section 3863, subsection 3,
paragraph D, subparagraph (4) and section 3863, subsection 3-A; and
(b) Recommendations on resources and supports that are needed to address
identified deficiencies and that would enable a facility to accept an individual
who would otherwise be denied admission.
(2) The report must include an assessment of the roles and responsibilities of
mental health agencies, human services agencies, health agencies and involved
state departments and must suggest ways in which these agencies and departments
can better cooperate to improve the service system for people with chronic mental
illness.
(3) The report must be prepared biennially and, must be submitted to the joint
standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over human resources
matters by December 15th of every even-numbered year and must be publicly
accessible, including on the department's website.
(4) The committee shall review the report and make recommendations with respect
to administrative and funding improvements in the system of community support
services to persons with chronic mental illness; and
Sec. 2. 34-B MRSA §3004, sub-§3, ¶D, as amended by PL 2011, c. 348, §9, is
further amended to read:
D. Participate with school administrative units in transition planning for each student
with chronic mental illnesses who is receiving special education services and who is
16 years of age or older, or 14 years of age if determined appropriate by the student's
individualized education program team, and shall assign appropriate staff as a
transition contact person and as a member of the transition planning team for each
student.; and
Sec. 3. 34-B MRSA §3004, sub-§3, ¶E is enacted to read:
E. By December 15th of every even-numbered year, each psychiatric hospital, as
defined in section 3801, subsection 7-B, shall submit a biennial report to the
department, including:
(1) The total number of inpatient beds for which the hospital controls admission;
(2) The physical address of each facility within the State with inpatient beds under
the hospital's control and the number of licensed beds at each facility; and
Page 1 - 132LR1065(01)

(3) The total number of days each inpatient bed was occupied by a patient as
defined in section 3801, subsection 7.
By January 15th of every odd-numbered year, the department shall compile the data
received under this paragraph into a report that identifies statewide trends and
utilization patterns and make the report publicly accessible, including on the
department's website.
Sec. 4. 34-B MRSA §3863, sub-§3, ¶D, as enacted by PL 2015, c. 309, §3, is
amended by amending subparagraph (2) to read:
(2) The hospital, after undertaking its best efforts, has been unable to locate an
available inpatient bed at a psychiatric hospital or other appropriate alternative;
and
Sec. 5. 34-B MRSA §3863, sub-§3, ¶D, as enacted by PL 2015, c. 309, §3, is
amended by amending subparagraph (3) to read:
(3) The hospital has notified the department of the name of the person, the location
of the person, the name of the appropriately designated individual who conducted
the evaluation pursuant to subparagraph (1) and the time the person first presented
to the hospital.; and
Sec. 6. 34-B MRSA §3863, sub-§3, ¶D, as enacted by PL 2015, c. 309, §3, is
amended by enacting subparagraph (4) to read:
(4) The hospital has provided to the department the documentation received under
subsection 3-A for any psychiatric hospital that has declined a referral for
admission of the person.
Sec. 7. 34-B MRSA §3863, sub-§3-A is enacted to read:
3-A. Referral for admission declined by psychiatric hospital. A psychiatric
hospital that declines a referral for admission from a referring hospital under this section
shall provide the referring hospital with a written explanation for declining the referral,
including:
A. A detailed explanation of the specific reasons for declining to admit the person; and
B. A description of the specific circumstances or changes that would allow the
psychiatric hospital to reconsider and accept the referral at a later time.
If the psychiatric hospital has previously declined admission for the person and
subsequently admitted another person, the psychiatric hospital shall explain the decision to
accept the subsequent person in preference over the previously declined person, keeping
personally identifying information of each person confidential and focusing solely on the
clinical or logistical criteria used to make the admission decision.
A psychiatric hospital shall make a written explanation under this subsection available,
upon request, to the person who was declined admission.
Sec. 8. 34-B MRSA §3863, sub-§3-B is enacted to read:
3-B. Daily data on available beds at psychiatric hospitals. A psychiatric hospital,
as defined in section 3801, subsection 7-B, shall submit the following data to the
department at least once every 24 hours:
Page 2 - 132LR1065(01)

A. The name and address of the psychiatric hospital, including the location of all
inpatient beds for which the psychiatric hospital controls admissions;
B. The total number of inpatient beds at the psychiatric hospital; and
C. The number of inpatient beds at the time of reporting that are occupied by a patient
as defined in section 3801, subsection 7.
The department shall compile the data received under this subsection and present the data
in a format that allows for easy identification of inpatient bed availability, sorted by
psychiatric hospital, in real time on a publicly accessible website.